District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.10

Failure to maintain marketing and performance records.

No person shall fail to maintain its books, records, documents, and other business records in such order that data regarding complaints, claims, rating, underwriting, and marketing are not accessible and retrievable for examination by the Commissioner. Data for at least the current calendar year and the 2 preceding years shall be maintained.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 110, 48 DCR 1225

History